Montana, session 2025, SB105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 13-35-211, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-35-211. Electioneering -- soliciting information from electors. (1) A A person may not do any
electioneering on election day within any polling place or any building in which an election is being held at any
location where an elector may obtain or vote a ballot, or within 100 feet of any entrance to the a building in
which the polling place is located an elector may obtain or vote a ballot, during the hours the location is open to
obtain or vote a ballot, that aids or promotes the success or defeat of any candidate or ballot issue to be voted
upon on at the election.
(2) On election day, a A candidate, a family member of a candidate, or a worker or volunteer for
the candidate's campaign may not distribute alcohol, tobacco, food, drink, or anything of value to a voter within
a polling place or a building in which an election is being held in any location where an elector may obtain or
vote a ballot, or within 100 feet of an entrance to the a building in which the polling place is located an elector
may obtain or vote a ballot, during the hours the location is open to electors to obtain or vote a ballot.
(3) A person may not buy, sell, give, wear, or display at or about the polls on a n election day any
location where an elector may obtain or vote a ballot, during the hours the location is open to electors to obtain
or vote a ballot, any badge, button, or other insignia that is designed or tends to aid or promote the success or
defeat of any candidate or ballot issue to be voted upon on at the election.
(4) A person within a polling place or any building in which an election is being held a location
where an elector may obtain or vote a ballot, during the hours the location is open to electors to obtain or vote a
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 105
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 105
ballot, may not solicit from an elector, before or after the elector has marked a ballot and returned it to an
election judge, information as to whether the elector intends to vote or has voted for or against a candidate or
ballot issue."
Section 2. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a copy of [this act]
to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 105
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 105, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 105
INTRODUCED BY J. WINDY BOY, S. WEBBER, M. YAKAWICH
AN ACT PROHIBITING ELECTIONEERING AT ALL POLLING LOCATIONS FOR ALL ELECTIONS FROM THE
TIME ABSENTEE BALLOTS ARE AVAILABLE UNTIL ALL VOTING IS COMPLETED; AMENDING SECTION
13-35-211, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE.